Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 20 RECLAMATION OF CAREY ACT LANDS
§ 42-2039. Restoration of lands authorized.

The legislature hereby recognizes and acknowledges the need to assure replacement of the grazing and wildlife land uses displaced by Carey Act developments. In order to facilitate such replacements, any settlers having contracts with the state for reclamation of lands segregated under the Carey Act shall include grazing and wildlife restoration work in total or in part to the maximum expenditure of five dollars ($5.00) per acre for grazing restoration and one dollar ($1.00) per acre for wildlife restoration as a legitimate and necessary cost of the reclamation effort. The settlers are hereby authorized to subcontract with the bureau of land management, or any party designated by the bureau, for the purpose of accomplishing this restoration work. Payment by the Carey Act settlers for the restoration work shall be at the time the settler is granted patent to the lands developed. The director of the department of water resources is hereby authorized and directed to accept restoration expenditures as bona fide land development costs of the company up to an amount not to exceed five dollars ($5.00) per acre for grazing restoration and one dollar ($1.00) per acre for wildlife restoration.

In the event that no suitable lands are available for restoration as grazing lands as provided herein, the director is authorized to so certify, and the payment in lieu of restoration shall be made directly to the person with previous grazing rights to the land under Carey Act development.

In those instances where a Carey Act project application is filed for land on which any livestock watering improvements, established trail rights, or recent successful reseedings of less than five (5) years usage are in place and functional at the time of the filing, then these watering improvements, trail rights or reseedings shall be replaced in kind notwithstanding costs in excess of the limitation of five dollars ($5.00) imposed herein. The director of the department of water resources shall be responsible for the negotiation and determination of the values in excess of five dollars ($5.00) per acre which are involved in qualifying water improvements, trail rights or recent reseedings and to whom the payments for excess values shall be made.

§ 42-2040. Suits by department.

All suits or actions under the provisions of this chapter, shall be brought by the director of the department of water resources.

§ 42-2041. Indian Hills Project — Legislative finding.

The legislature finds and declares that the development and settlement of arid lands under the Carey Act as provided in chapter 20, title 42, Idaho Code, and development of Carey Act projects by the Idaho water resource board are in the public interest.

§ 42-2042. Authorization — Financing.

Pursuant to section 42-1756, Idaho Code, the Idaho water resource board is authorized to plan, finance, construct, acquire, operate, own, maintain, and be the project sponsor and developer of a water resource development project as provided in the provisions of the Carey Act and to use the water resource board revolving development fund and revenues or other additions thereto from any source, including, but not limited to, proceeds from loans secured by project revenues, to finance or guarantee the funding of said project. Said project is known as the Indian Hills project, which is located in Owyhee county approximately two (2) miles southwest of Hammett, Idaho. The Idaho water resource board is authorized by this act to proceed with the project on the basis identified and approved by the Idaho water resource board in the proposal submitted, pursuant to section 42-1734(11), Idaho Code, to the governor of Idaho on November 25, 1974; and the Idaho water resource board is further authorized to proceed in accordance with and exercise the authority for issuance of revenue bonds as provided in section 42-1734(17), Idaho Code. The Idaho water resource board is further authorized to own, sell, convey, mortgage, pledge or incumber the lands for said project and do all things necessary for the construction and completion of said project including the acquisition of all necessary real and personal property in connection therewith, together with all necessary pumping and water distribution works and facilities at the site of such water project and all other necessary and related structures and equipment, and, in addition to the powers conferred elsewhere on the Idaho water resource board, to issue and sell revenue bonds under the provisions of sections 42-1739 through 42-1749, Idaho Code, pledging thereto the revenues which the board shall derive from such water project, and such other revenues as may come into the water resource board revolving development fund from any source whatsoever, including, but not limited to, any tax funds pledged or dedicated to the water resource board revolving development fund, in order to pay the costs of planning, financing, acquiring, construction, operation and maintenance of such water project. The water resource board is further authorized to charge and collect such fees and assessments necessary for payment and reimbursement for all the costs of said project and the water resource board shall have a first and prior lien upon all lands of the project and water rights now appurtenant or to become appurtenant to said lands and water distribution facilities; said lien shall be in all respects prior to any and all other liens no matter how created or attempted to be created by the owner or possessor of the project lands or by law, and shall remain in full force and effect until the last deferred payment for water rights and project facilities is fully paid and satisfied according to the terms of the contract under which water is acquired for said project by persons making entry upon said lands.

§ 42-2043. Source of lands.

If the lands in the project area become available to the state of Idaho by direct grant from the United States, other than through provisions of the Carey Act, the Idaho water resource board is authorized to proceed, as set forth in this act, as though the project were under the provisions of the Carey Act.

§ 42-2044. Exemption from appropriation restrictions.

The development of the water project authorized in this act is hereby declared to be exempt from the provision expressed in the last sentence of Section 1 of Chapter 470, Idaho Laws of 1969.